California statutes. Education Code
(a) Upon request of the State Allocation Board, the State School Building Finance Committee shall determine by resolution whether or not it is necessary or desirable to issue bonds authorized pursuant to this chapter in order to fund the related apportionments and, if so, the amount of bonds to be issued and sold. Successive issues of bonds may be authorized and sold to fund those apportionments progressively, and it is not necessary that all
 of the bonds authorized to be issued be sold at any one time.

(b) A request of the State Allocation Board pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be supported by a statement of the apportionments made and to be made for the purposes described in Section 101412.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 28.   (AB 247)   Approved in Proposition 2 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

101424.

There shall be collected each year, in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected and in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state, a sum in an amount required to pay the principal of, and interest on, the bonds each year. It is the duty of all officers charged by law with any duty in regard to the collection of the revenue to do and perform each and every act that is necessary to collect that additional sum.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 28.   (AB 247)   Approved in Proposition 2 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

101425.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, there is hereby appropriated from the General Fund in the State Treasury, for the purposes of this chapter, an amount that equals the total of the following:

(a) The sum annually necessary to pay the principal of, and interest on, bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter, as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) The sum necessary to carry out Section 101428, appropriated without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 28.   (AB 247)   Approved in Proposition 2 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

101426.

The State Allocation Board may request the Pooled Money Investment Board to make a loan from the Pooled Money Investment Account or any other approved form of interim financing, in accordance with Section 16312 of the Government Code, for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. The amount of the request shall not exceed the amount of the unsold bonds that the State School Building Finance Committee, by resolution, has authorized to be sold for the purpose of
 carrying out this chapter excluding any refunding bonds authorized pursuant to Section 101430, less any amount loaned and not yet repaid pursuant to this section and withdrawn from the General Fund pursuant to Section 101428 and not yet returned. The State Allocation Board shall execute any documents required by the Pooled Money Investment Board to obtain and repay the loan. Any amounts loaned shall be deposited in the 2024 State School Facilities Fund to be allocated by the State Allocation Board in accordance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 28.   (AB 247)   Approved in Proposition 2 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

101427.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, or of the State General Obligation Bond Law, if the Treasurer sells bonds pursuant to this chapter that include a bond counsel opinion to the effect that the interest on the bonds is excluded from gross income for federal tax purposes under designated conditions or is otherwise entitled to any federal tax advantage, the Treasurer may maintain separate accounts for the investment of bond proceeds and for the
 investment earnings on those proceeds. The Treasurer may use or direct the use of those proceeds or earnings to pay any rebate, penalty, or other payment required under federal law or take any other action with respect to the investment and use of those bond proceeds required or desirable under federal law to maintain the tax-exempt status of those bonds and to obtain any other advantage under federal law on behalf of the funds of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 28.   (AB 247)   Approved in Proposition 2 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

101428.

For purposes of carrying out this chapter, the Director of Finance may authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of an amount not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds, excluding any refunding bonds authorized pursuant to Section 101430, less any amount loaned and not yet repaid pursuant to Section 101426 and withdrawn from the General Fund pursuant to this section and not yet returned, that have been authorized by the State School Building Finance
 Committee to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. Any amounts withdrawn shall be deposited in the 2024 State School Facilities Fund and allocated by the State Allocation Board in accordance with this chapter. Any money made available under this section shall be returned to the General Fund, plus an amount equal to the interest that the money would have earned in the Pooled Money Investment Account, from proceeds received from the sale of bonds for purposes of carrying out this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 28.   (AB 247)   Approved in Proposition 2 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

101429.

All moneys deposited in the 2024 State School Facilities Fund that are derived from premium and accrued interest on bonds sold pursuant to this chapter shall be reserved in the fund and shall be available for transfer to the General Fund as a credit to expenditures for bond interest, except those amounts derived from premium may be reserved and used to pay the cost of the bond issuance before any transfer to the General Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 28.   (AB 247)   Approved in Proposition 2 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

101430.

The bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter may be refunded in accordance with Article 6 (commencing with Section 16780) of Chapter 4 of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, which is a part of the State General Obligation Bond Law. Approval by the voters of the state for the issuance of the bonds described in this chapter includes the approval of the issuance of any bonds issued to refund any bonds originally issued under this chapter or
 any previously issued refunding bonds. Any bond refunded with the proceeds of refunding bonds as authorized by this section may be legally defeased to the extent permitted by law in the manner and to the extent set forth in the resolution, as amended from time to time, authorizing that refunded bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 28.   (AB 247)   Approved in Proposition 2 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

101431.

The proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by this chapter are not “proceeds of taxes” as that term is used in Article XIIIB of the California Constitution, and the disbursement of these proceeds is not subject to the limitations imposed by that article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 28.   (AB 247)   Approved in Proposition 2 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. California Community College Facilities [101440. - 101452.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [101440. - 101440.]

101440.

(a) The 2024 California Community College Capital Outlay Bond Fund is hereby established in the State Treasury for deposit of funds from the proceeds of bonds, not including the proceeds of any refunding bonds issued in accordance with Section 101451, issued and sold for the purposes of this chapter.

(b) The Higher Education Facilities Finance Committee established pursuant to Section 67353 is hereby continued in existence to act as the committee, as defined in the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), for purposes of this chapter and to provide funds to aid the California
 Community Colleges.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 28.   (AB 247)   Approved in Proposition 2 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. California Community College Program Provisions [101441. - 101441.]

101441.

(a) From the proceeds of bonds issued and sold pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 101442), the sum of one billion five hundred million dollars ($1,500,000,000) shall be deposited in the 2024 California Community College Capital Outlay Bond Fund for purposes of this chapter. When appropriated, these funds shall be available for expenditure for purposes of this chapter.

(b) The purposes of this chapter include assisting in meeting the capital outlay financing needs of the
 California Community Colleges.

(c) Proceeds from the sale of bonds issued and sold for purposes of this chapter may be used to fund construction on existing campuses, including the construction of buildings and the acquisition of related fixtures; construction of intersegmental facilities; the renovation and reconstruction of facilities; site acquisition; the equipping of new, renovated, or reconstructed facilities, which equipment shall have an average useful life of 10 years; and to provide funds for the payment of preconstruction costs, including, but not limited to, preliminary plans and working drawings for facilities of the California Community Colleges.

(d) For purposes of this section, “intersegmental” means may be used by more than one segment of public higher
 education.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 28.   (AB 247)   Approved in Proposition 2 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. California Community College Fiscal Provisions [101442. - 101452.]

101442.

(a) Of the total amount of bonds authorized to be issued and sold pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 101400), bonds in the total amount of one billion five hundred million dollars ($1,500,000,000), not including the amount of any refunding bonds issued in accordance with Section 101451, may be issued and sold to provide a fund to be used for carrying out the purposes expressed in this chapter and to reimburse the General Obligation
 Bond Expense Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 16724.5 of the Government Code.

(b) Pursuant to this section, the Treasurer shall sell the bonds authorized by the Higher Education Facilities Finance Committee established pursuant to Section 67353 at any different times necessary to service expenditures required by the apportionments.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 28.   (AB 247)   Approved in Proposition 2 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

101443.

(a) The bonds authorized by this chapter shall be prepared, executed, issued, sold, paid, and redeemed as provided in the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code). The provisions of that law, including all acts amendatory thereof and supplementary thereto, apply to those authorized bonds and this chapter, and are hereby incorporated into this chapter
 as though set forth in full within this chapter, except that subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 16727 of the Government Code shall not apply to the bonds authorized by this chapter.

(b) For purposes of the State General Obligation Bond Law, each state agency administering an appropriation of the 2024 Community College Capital Outlay Bond Fund is designated as the “board” for projects funded pursuant to this chapter.

(c) The proceeds of the bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter shall be available for the purpose of funding aid to the California Community Colleges for construction on existing or new campuses, and their respective off-campus centers and joint use and intersegmental facilities, as set forth in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 28.   (AB 247)   Approved in Proposition 2 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

101444.

The Higher Education Facilities Finance Committee established pursuant to Section 67353 shall authorize the issuance of bonds under this chapter only to the extent necessary to fund the related apportionments for the purposes described in this chapter that are expressly authorized by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act. Pursuant to that legislative direction, the committee shall determine by resolution whether or not it is necessary or desirable to issue bonds
 authorized pursuant to this chapter in order to carry out the purposes described in this chapter and, if so, the amount of bonds to be issued and sold. Successive issues of bonds may be authorized and sold to carry out those actions progressively, and it is not necessary that all of the bonds authorized to be issued be sold at any one time.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 28.   (AB 247)   Approved in Proposition 2 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

101445.

There shall be collected each year and in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state, a sum in an amount required to pay the principal of, and interest on, the bonds each year. It is the duty of all officers charged by law with any duty in regard to the collection of the revenue to do and perform each and every act that is necessary to collect that additional sum.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 28.   (AB 247)   Approved in Proposition 2 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

101446.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, there is hereby appropriated from the General Fund in the State Treasury, for the purposes of this chapter, an amount that equals the total of the following:

(a) The sum annually necessary to pay the principal of, and interest on, bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter, as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) The sum necessary to carry out Section 101449, appropriated without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 28.   (AB 247)   Approved in Proposition 2 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

101447.

The board, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 101443, may request the Pooled Money Investment Board to make a loan from the Pooled Money Investment Account or any other approved form of interim financing, in accordance with Section 16312 of the Government Code, for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. The amount of the request shall not exceed the amount of the unsold bonds that the Higher Education Facilities Finance Committee, by resolution, has
 authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this chapter excluding any refunding bonds authorized pursuant to Section 101451, less any amount loaned and not yet repaid pursuant to this section and withdrawn from the General Fund pursuant to Section 101249 and not yet returned. The board, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 101443, shall execute any documents required by the Pooled Money Investment Board to obtain and repay the loan. Any amounts loaned shall be deposited in the 2024 California Community College Capital Outlay Bond Fund to be allocated by the board in accordance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 28.   (AB 247)   Approved in Proposition 2 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

101448.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, or of the State General Obligation Bond Law, if the Treasurer sells bonds pursuant to this chapter that include a bond counsel opinion to the effect that the interest on the bonds is excluded from gross income for federal tax purposes under designated conditions or is otherwise entitled to any federal tax advantage, the Treasurer may maintain separate accounts for the investment of bond proceeds and for the
 investment earnings on those proceeds. The Treasurer may use or direct the use of those proceeds or earnings to pay any rebate, penalty, or other payment required under federal law or take any other action with respect to the investment and use of those bond proceeds required or desirable under federal law to maintain the tax-exempt status of those bonds and to obtain any other advantage under federal law on behalf of the funds of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 28.   (AB 247)   Approved in Proposition 2 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

101449.

(a) For purposes of carrying out this chapter, the Director of Finance may authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of an amount not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds, excluding any refunding bonds authorized pursuant to Section 101451, less any amount loaned and not yet repaid pursuant to Section 101447 and withdrawn from the General Fund pursuant to this section and not yet returned, that have been authorized by the Higher
 Education Facilities Finance Committee to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. Any amounts withdrawn shall be deposited in the 2024 California Community College Capital Outlay Bond Fund consistent with this chapter. Any money made available under this section shall be returned to the General Fund, plus an amount equal to the interest that the money would have earned in the Pooled Money Investment Account, from proceeds received from the sale of bonds for purposes of carrying out this chapter.

(b) Any request forwarded to the Legislature and the Department of Finance for funds from this bond issue for expenditure for the purposes described in this chapter by the California Community Colleges shall be accompanied by a five-year capital outlay plan that reflects the needs and priorities of the community college system and is prioritized on a statewide basis. Requests shall include a schedule that prioritizes the seismic
 retrofitting needed to significantly reduce, in the judgment of the particular college, seismic hazards in buildings identified as high priority by the college.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 28.   (AB 247)   Approved in Proposition 2 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

101450.

All moneys deposited in the 2024 California Community College Capital Outlay Bond Fund that are derived from premium and accrued interest on bonds sold pursuant to this chapter shall be reserved in the fund and shall be available for transfer to the General Fund as a credit to expenditures for bond interest, except those amounts derived from premium may be reserved and used to pay the cost of the bond issuance before any transfer to the General
 Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 28.   (AB 247)   Approved in Proposition 2 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

101451.

The bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter may be refunded in accordance with Article 6 (commencing with Section 16780) of Chapter 4 of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, which is a part of the State General Obligation Bond Law. Approval by the voters of the state for the issuance of the bonds described in this chapter includes the approval of the issuance of any bonds issued to refund any bonds originally issued under this chapter or
 any previously issued refunding bonds. Any bond refunded with the proceeds of refunding bonds as authorized by this section may be legally defeased to the extent permitted by law in the manner and to the extent set forth in the resolution, as amended from time to time, authorizing that refunded bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 28.   (AB 247)   Approved in Proposition 2 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

101452.

The proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by this chapter are not “proceeds of taxes” as that term is used in Article XIIIB of the California Constitution, and the disbursement of these proceeds is not subject to the limitations imposed by that article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 28.   (AB 247)   Approved in Proposition 2 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Transparency and Accountability Provisions [101460. - 101460.]

101460.

(a) (1) The governing board of a school district, the governing board of a community college district, a county superintendent of schools, or the governing body of a charter school shall ensure that an independent performance audit of any project funded in whole or in part from the proceeds of bonds authorized by this part is conducted to ensure that the use of the applicable funds has been reviewed for expenditure consistent with the requirements of all applicable laws.

(2) A performance audit conducted for any project funded in whole or in part from the proceeds of bonds authorized by this part and required by any other law, including, but not limited to, an audit conducted pursuant to Section 41024, shall be
 deemed to satisfy the requirement of paragraph (1).

(3) The result of any audit required by this subdivision shall be posted on the internet website of the applicable school district, community college district, county office of education, or charter school.

(b) (1) (A) Before approving a project or projects seeking funds from this part, the governing board of a school district, a county board of education, or the governing body of a charter school shall hold at least one public hearing to solicit input from members of the public regarding the project or projects being proposed for submission.

(B) Before approving a request for the consideration of a project or projects by the Legislature that would be funded by the proceeds of bonds authorized by this part, the governing
 board of a community college district shall hold at least one public hearing to solicit input from members of the public regarding the project or projects being requested for consideration.

(2) The public hearing required pursuant to paragraph (1) may occur at the same public hearing in which the applicable governing board or body approves the project or projects seeking funds from this part. The public hearing may be conducted as part of a regularly scheduled and publicly noticed hearing of the applicable governing board or body.

(3) (A) A school district, county office of education, charter school, or community college district shall post information regarding a project or projects seeking, or requesting, funds from this part that have been approved by the applicable governing board or body on its public internet website.

(B) The project information reflected on the internet website pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall include, but not be limited to, the location of the project or projects, estimated project costs, and the estimated timeline for the completion of the project or projects.

(4) (A) A school district, county office of education, charter school, or community college district shall retain all financial accounts, documents, and records necessary for the audit required pursuant to subdivision (a).

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, a school district, county office of education, charter school, or community college district may maintain records electronically in compliance with any applicable state and federal laws.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 28.   (AB 247)   Approved in Proposition 2 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

